pt-PT: Nível de proteção à prova de balas: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Outro
sk-SK: Úroveň balistickej ochrany: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Iné
ru: Класс защиты от пуль: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Другое
en: Bullet protection level: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Other
sv: Kulskyddsnivå: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Övrigt
sl-SI: Stopnja zaščite pred izstrelki: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Drugo
zh-CN: 防弹等级: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; 其他
ko: 방탄 수준: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; 기타
bg-BG: Ниво на защита от куршуми: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Други
tr: Kurşun Koruma Seviyesi: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο προστασίας από σφαίρες: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Άλλο
pl: Poziom ochrony przed pociskami: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Inne
de: Kugelschutzstufe: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Sonstiges
hu: Golyóállósági szint: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Egyéb
ja: 弾丸防御レベル: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; その他
it: Livello di protezione antiproiettile: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Altro
hr-HR: Razina zaštite od metaka: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Ostalo
th: ระดับการป้องกันกระสุน: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Nivel de protecție împotriva gloanțelor: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Altele
zh-TW: 防彈等級: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; 其他
nb: Kulebeskyttelsesnivå: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Annet
vi: Cấp bảo vệ chống đạn: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Khác
nl: Kogelbeschermingsniveau: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Andere
pt-BR: Nível de proteção contra balas: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Outro
da: Kuglebeskyttelsesniveau: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Andet
cs: Stupeň balistické odolnosti: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Jiné
fi: Luotisuojataso: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Muu
fr: Niveau de protection contre les balles: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Autre
lt-LT: Apsaugos nuo kulkų lygis: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Kita
es: Nivel de protección balística: II; IIA; III; IIIA; IV; Otros